Nebraska, session 109, LB282.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB282 LB282
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, a teacher
employed at an approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or
parochial school in this state teaching kindergarten through twelfth
grade may apply to the State Department of Education on forms and in a
manner prescribed by the department to receive up to three hundred
dollars in reimbursement for school supplies paid for by such teacher. A
teacher shall be required to show receipts for such supplies in order to
receive reimbursement.
(2) The State Board of Education shall develop a policy, which shall
be available on the State Department of Education's website, relating to
the types of school supplies that qualify for reimbursement pursuant to
this section.
(3) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-